Vermont, session 2025-2026, H145.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the meetings of public bodies
balance the speech rights of Vermont’s citizens, the freedom and right to
VT LEG #379149 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.145
2025 Page 2 of 4
assemble, and the necessity for the effective and efficient conduct of
governmental business. Members of the public should be able to attend
meetings and engage in the free interchange of ideas, but should not be
permitted to obstruct the continuation of a meeting without regard to the
explicit rules governing the meeting’s conduct. The obstructive conduct of one
member of the public should not be permitted to eliminate the interests of other
members of the public to peacefully assemble at an open meeting. Public
bodies should understand that an adverse audience is part of the democratic
process and should not attempt to enforce arbitrary rules of order or attempt to
remove members of the public who do not cause the substantial disruption of a
meeting. Accordingly, it is the intent of the General Assembly that all public
bodies have the authority to adopt appropriate rules governing the conduct and
participation of the public at a meeting subject to Vermont’s Open Meeting
Law. Further, it is the intent of the General Assembly that an individual’s
actions be subject to Vermont’s disorderly conduct statute when the actions
interfere with a meeting of a public body so that the meeting prematurely
terminates or consist of numerous and sustained efforts to disrupt the meeting
after the public body has requested that the individual desist.
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 312 is amended to read:
§ 312. RIGHT TO ATTEND MEETINGS OF PUBLIC AGENCIES
* * *
VT LEG #379149 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.145
2025 Page 3 of 4
(h) At an open meeting, the public shall be given a reasonable opportunity
to express its opinion on matters considered by the public body during the
meeting, as long as provided order is maintained. This subsection shall not
apply to quasi-judicial proceedings.
(1) Public comment shall be subject to reasonable rules established by
the chairperson. This subsection shall not apply to quasi-judicial proceedings.
The public body may adopt rules governing the conduct and participation of
the public, which may include rules that prohibit the disruption of a meeting.
(2) An individual may be required to leave or removed from a meeting
for engaging in conduct that violates the rules governing the conduct and
participation of the public. An individual who is required to leave or removed
from a meeting may be prohibited from attending in-person meetings of a
public body for not more than 60 days, provided that the public body conducts
its meetings in a hybrid or electronic fashion and the individual is permitted to
attend and participate in the meetings electronically.
* * *
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 1026 is amended to read:
§ 1026. DISORDERLY CONDUCT
(a) A person is guilty of disorderly conduct if he or she the person, with
intent to cause public inconvenience or annoyance, or recklessly creates a risk
thereof:
VT LEG #379149 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.145
2025 Page 4 of 4
* * *
(4) without lawful authority, disturbs any lawful assembly or meeting of
persons; or
(5) obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic; or
(6) substantially impairs the effective conduct of a meeting of a public
body.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379149 v.2